src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2018 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! # Kildin Sámi TWOLC file
!
! $Id$

!! ## Symbol declarations
!! ### Alphabet

Alphabet
  а А ӓ Ӓ а̄ А̄ б Б в В г Г д Д !!= * @CODE@  
  е Е ё Ё е̄ Е̄ ё̄ Ё̄ ж Ж з З һ Һ !!= * @CODE@ 
  и И ӣ Ӣ й Й ҋ Ҋ ј Ј к К л Л !!= * @CODE@ 
  ӆ Ӆ м М ӎ Ӎ н Н ӊ Ӊ ӈ Ӈ о О !!= * @CODE@ 
  о̄ О̄ п П р Р ҏ Ҏ с С т Т у У !!= * @CODE@ 
  ӯ Ӯ ф Ф х Х ц Ц ч Ч ш Ш щ Щ !!= * @CODE@ 
  ъ Ъ ы Ы ь Ь ъ Ъ ҍ Ҍ э Э ӭ Ӭ !!= * @CODE@ 
  э̄ Э̄ ю Ю ю̄ Ю̄ я Я я̄ Я̄         !!= * @CODE@ 

! SNM 13.12.2018: Commented out the following two lines, they caused PUNCT
! analyses of empty strings. The symbols are not used in any lexc file, which
! makes the twolc definition useless.
!  %´:0 
!  %,:%´

!! ### Trigger symbols
  %^1VOW:0		!!= * @CODE@ Vow trigger for epenthetic -э-
  %^2VOW:0		!!= * @CODE@ Vow trigger 
  %^3VOW:0		!!= * @CODE@ Vow trigger 
  %^4VOW:0		!!= * @CODE@ Vow trigger 
  %^5VOW:0		!!= * @CODE@ Vow trigger 
  %^VOWSH:0             !!= * @CODE@ 
  %^WG:0		!!= * @CODE@ for weak consonant stem gradation 
  %^EPHV:0         !!= * @CODE@ 
  %^DI:0             !!= * @CODE@ 
  %^CLPAL:0    !!= * @CODE@ 
  %^CLDPAL:0	!!= * @CODE@ for depalatalizing consonant stems
  %^DPAL:0		!!= * @CODE@ for depalatalizing consonant stems
  %^MON:0   !!= * @CODE@ 
  %^PAL:0		!!= * @CODE@ for palatalizing consonsant stems

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

! Morpheme boundaries:
 «  ! Derivational prefix
 »  ! Derivational suffix
 %< ! Inflectional prefix
 %> ! Inflectional suffix
 #  ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 %^ ! (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
 %- ! Hyphen for question particle
 
! End of alphabet definitions
;

!! ## Sets
Sets
 C  = б Б в В г Г д Д ж Ж з З һ Һ й Й ҋ Ҋ ј Ј к К л Л ӆ Ӆ м М ӎ Ӎ н Н ӊ Ӊ ӈ Ӈ п П р Р ҏ Ҏ с С т Т ф Ф х Х ц Ц ч Ч ш Ш щ Щ ; !!= * @CODE@ 
 V  = а А ӓ Ӓ а̄ А̄ е Е е̄ Е̄ ё Ё ё̄ Ё̄ и И ӣ Ӣ о О о̄ О̄ у У ӯ Ӯ ы Ы э Э ӭ Ӭ э̄ Э̄ ю Ю ю̄ Ю̄ я Я я̄ Я̄ ; !!= * @CODE@ 
 PALMARK = ь Ь ҍ Ҍ ; !!= * @CODE@ 
 VPLOS = г Г ; !!= * @CODE@ 
 VLPLOS = к К ; !!= * @CODE@ 
 PALCON = ж Ж й Й ҋ Ҋ ј Ј ч Ч ; !!= * @CODE@  can only by followed by PALVOW !so-called "palatalized C"
 PALVOW = е Е е̄ Е̄ ё Ё ё̄ Ё̄ и И ӣ Ӣ ю Ю ю̄ Ю̄ я Я я̄ Я̄ ; !!= * @CODE@ so-called "palatalized V"
 HPLVOW = ӓ Ӓ ӭ Ӭ ; !!= * @CODE@  so-called "half-palatalized V"
 NPLVOW = а А а̄ А̄ о О о̄ О̄ у У ӯ Ӯ ы Ы э Э э̄ Э̄ ; !!= * @CODE@  so-called "non-palatalized V"
 
 Dummy  = %^WG %^DI %^DPAL %^MON %> %^PAL %^CLPAL ; !!= * @CODE@ 


!! # Rule section
Rules

"Quantitative CG xxy:xy (of nonpal cлusters)"
!! **@RULENAME@**  e.g. са̄ррн:са̄рн, ко̄ллм:ко̄лм, сыййт:сыйт, etc. 
Cx:0 <=> V: Cx: _ Cy: %^WG: ; !doesn't work where V=а̄ (combining macron)
 where Cx in ( в л й й й м н н п р ш ш )  
       Cy in ( т к в н т ч ц ч ч н к т )
       matched ;
	      	
"Qualitative CG xx:y (of voiced affricates)"      
!! **@RULENAME@** i.e. джь : жь, дзь : зь, дз : з
д:0 <=> V: _ Cx: (PALMARK:) %^WG: ; !doesn't work where V=а̄ (combining macron)
 where Cx in ( з ж ) ;
   
"Quantitative CG (of continuants)"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Cx:0 <=> V: _ Cx: (PALMARK:) %^WG: ; !doesn't work where V=а̄ (combining macron)
 where Cx in ( в ж з й л м н ӈ р ф х ) ; 
      
"ue>ua Ablaut"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
э:а <=> у _ (C*:) (C:) %^CLDPAL:0  ;
!this ablaut coincides with depalatalization of palatalized stems, e.g. 3sg.prs in verbs, ill.sg in (certain classes of) nouns

"Epenthetic vowel deletion (npal vowels)"
!! **@RULENAME@** e.g. ко̄рэб:ко̄рбэсьт, etc. шоабаш-:шоабш-
Vx:0  <=> C _ C+ %^EPHV:0 %>: V ;
    where Vx in ( а А э Э ) ;



!"Palatalization (of nonpal clusters)"
! __@RULENAME@__ e.g. шт:шьт, etc.
!0:ь <=> Cx _ Cy %^CLPAL:0 ;
!	where	Cx in ( в л р ш ш )
!			Cy in ( т к н к т )
!			matched ;
!0:ҍ <=> Cx _ Cy %^CLPAL:0 ;
!	where	Cx in ( в л р ш ш )
!			Cy in ( т к н к т )
!			matched ;
!this is a very explicit rule, where each valid consonant cluster is listed separately
!valid clusters which do not undergo (orthographic) palatalization (e.g. -йн-, etc.) are simply not listed here to avoid them, hence this rule is partly orthographic rather than truly morphonological
!the rule could be made truly morphonological by adding all valid consonant clusters and removing the palatalization mark by means of an additional rule
!
!this is a very explicit rule, where each valid consonant cluster is listed separately
!morphonologically, this rule should work for palatalized and non-palatalized clusters alike, see below
!"Quantitative CG xxy:xy "

!"De-Palatalization (of pal clusters)"
! __@RULENAME@__ e.g. лльк : ллк , ннҍц : ннц, etc.
!ь:0 <=> Cx _ Cy (DUMMY:0) %^CLDPAL:0 ;
!	where	Cx in ( в л м п р ш ш )  
!            Cy in ( т к ч ч н к т )
!	      	matched ;
!ҍ:0 <=> Cx _ Cy (DUMMY:0) %^CLDPAL:0 ;
!	where	Cx in ( н )  
!            Cy in ( ц )
!	      	matched ;
!this is a very explicit rule, where each valid consonant cluster is listed separately
!morphonologically, this rule should work for palatalized and non-palatalized clusters alike, see below
!"Quantitative CG xxy:xy "
!
!
!"Palatalization (geminates)"
! __@RULENAME@__ e.g. шт:шьт, etc.
!0:ҍ <=> Cx _ %^PAL:0 ;
!	where	Cx in ( д н ӊ ӈ т ) ;
!	
!"Adjusting half-palatalization mark"
! __@RULENAME@__ 
!ь:ҍ <=> Cx:0 _ ;
!	where	Cx in ( д н ӊ ӈ т ) ;
!I try to write an orthographic rule here
!
!"Qualitative CG xx:y (sibilant)"
! __@RULENAME@__ i.e. сс : з, шш : ж
!Cx:Cy <=> Cx _ %^WG:0 ;
!      where Cx in ( с ш )
!            Cy in ( з ж ) 
!      matched ;
!currently: сс>сз
!
!"Qualitative CG xx:yy (long preaspiration)"
! __@RULENAME@__ e.g. һк : гк
!һ:Cy <=> V: _ Cx: (PALMARK:) %^WG:0 ;
!      where Cx in ( к )
!            Cy in ( г ) 
!      matched ;
!
!"Qualitative CG xx:y (short preaspiration)"
! __@RULENAME@__ e.g. һк : к
!һ:Cy <=> V: _ Cx: (PALMARK:) %^WG:0 ;
!      where Cx in ( к )
!            Cy in ( г ) 
!      matched ;
!
! сс:с vs. сс:з (only last one is already defined as a rule below)
!"Qualitative CG1a"
! __@RULENAME@__ this rule doesn't work yet
!Cx:0 <=> V: _ Cx: (ь:) %^WG:0 ;
!      where Cx in ( с ) ;
!
!"Quantitative CG 2-Cns Cluster"
! __@RULENAME@__  e.g. ?ма̄дт : ма̄д, ?ма̄дтҍ : ма̄дҍ
! Cy:0 <=> Cx _  (PALMARK:) %^WG:0 ;
!      where Cx in ( б г д )  
!            Cy in ( п к т )
!      matched ;
!
!The following two rules should apply in combination, in order to first change a V-letter and later remove the trigger letter
!"Palatalised Suffix Vowel (before deletion)"
! __@RULENAME@__  e.g. ӣджь : ӣджя, кӯлль : кӯлле
!Vx:Vy <=> ь: ( Dummy:0 ) %>: _ ;
!    where Vx in ( а А э Э у У )
!          Vy in ( я Я е Е ю Ю ) 
!	matched ;
!
!orthographic rules
!
!"Palatal Mark Deletion"
! __@RULENAME@__  e.g. ӣджь : ӣджя, кӯлль : кӯлле
!Cx:0 <=> C: _ (Dummy:) %>:0 [ :я | :Я | :е | :Е ] ;
!    where Cx in ( ь Ь ) ;
!    !doesn't work yet
!	 
!The following two rules should apply in combination, in order to first change a V-letter and later remove the trigger letter
!"Half-Palatalised Suffix Vowel (before deletion)"
! __@RULENAME@__  e.g. нюннҍ : нюнӓ
!Vx:Vy <=> ҍ: ( Dummy:0 ) %>: _ ;
!      where Vx in ( а А э Э )
!            Vy in ( ӓ Ӓ ӭ Ӭ ) 
!      matched ;
!
!"Half-Palatal Mark Deletion"
! __@RULENAME@__  
! ҍ:0 <=> C: _ ( Dummy:0 ) %>:0 [ :ӓ | :Ӓ | :ӭ | :Ӭ ] ;
!
!"Epenthetic vowel deletion (npal vowels)"
! __@RULENAME@__ e.g. ко̄рэб:ко̄рбэсьт, etc. [шоабаш-:шоабш-]
!Vx:0  <=> C _ C+ %^EPHV:0 %>: V ;
!    where Vx in ( а А ) ; 
!	where Vx in ( э Э ) ;
!
!"ue Diphtongisation"
! __@RULENAME@__  
! э:а <=> у _ C:* %^DI:0  ;
!
!"ja to i in 2D Illative"
! __@RULENAME@__  
! я:и <=> _ C:* %^DI:0  ;
!
"ue from long u 1"
! __@RULENAME@__  
 ӯ:у <=> _ :э  C:* %^DI:  ;

"ue from long u 2"
! __@RULENAME@__  
 0:э <=> ӯ: _ C:* %^DI:0  ;

"uu from ua in 4D" !does not work
! __@RULENAME@__  
 а:0 <=> у _ C:* %^MON:0 ;


! FOR TESTING ONLY, THESE SHOULD NOT BE USED since src/orthography.regex handles this conversion
! "ue from composed u 1"
! ! __@RULENAME@__  
!  ӯ:у <=> _ :э  C:* %^DI:  ;
! 
! "ue from composed u 2"
! ! __@RULENAME@__  
!  0:э <=> ӯ: _ C:* %^DI:0  ;
